Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 27 Motor Vehicle Offenses
31-27-2.1.
Refusal to submit to chemical test.

Any person who operates a motor vehicle within this state shall be deemed to have given his or her consent to chemical tests of his or her breath, blood, saliva and/or urine for the purpose of determining the chemical content of his or her body fluids or breath. No more than two (2) complete tests, one for the presence of intoxicating liquor and one for the presence of toluene or any controlled substance, as defined in §

21-28-1.02

, shall be administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer having reasonable grounds to believe the person to have been driving a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor, toluene, or any controlled substance, as defined in chapter 28 of title 21, or any combination of these. The director of the department of health is empowered to make and file, with the secretary of state, regulations that prescribe the techniques and methods of chemical analysis of the person’s body fluids or breath and the qualifications and certification of individuals authorized to administer the testing and analysis.

If a person, for religious or medical reasons, cannot be subjected to blood tests, the person may file an affidavit with the division of motor vehicles stating the reasons why he or she cannot be required to take blood tests and a notation to this effect shall be made on his or her license. If that person is asked to submit to chemical tests as provided under this chapter, the person shall only be required to submit to chemical tests of his or her breath, saliva or urine. When a person is requested to submit to blood tests, only a physician or registered nurse, or a medical technician certified under regulations promulgated by the director of the department of health, may withdraw blood for the purpose of determining the alcoholic content in it. This limitation shall not apply to the taking of breath, saliva or urine specimens. The person tested shall be permitted to have a physician of his or her own choosing, and at his or her own expense, administer chemical tests of his or her breath, blood, saliva and/or urine in addition to the tests administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer. If a person, having been placed under arrest, refuses upon the request of a law enforcement officer to submit to the tests, as provided in §

31-27-2

, none shall be given.

At the initial traffic tribunal appearance, the magistrate shall review the incident, action, and/or arrest reports submitted by the law enforcement officer to determine if there exists reasonable grounds to believe that the person had been driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor, toluene, or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of title 21, or any combination thereof. The magistrate shall also determine if the person had been informed of the penalties incurred as a result of failing to submit to a chemical test as provided in this section and that the person had been informed of the implied consent notice contained in subsection (c)(10) of this section. For the purpose of this subsection only, “driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of any controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of title 21” shall be indicated by the presence or aroma of a controlled substance on or about the person or vehicle of the individual refusing the chemical test or other reliable indicia or articulable conditions that the person was impaired due to their intake of a controlled substance.

If the magistrate determines that subsection (b)(1) of this section has been satisfied they shall promptly order that the person’s operator’s license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state be immediately suspended. Said suspension shall be subject to the hardship provisions enumerated in §

31-27-2.8

.

A traffic tribunal judge or magistrate, or a district court judge or magistrate, pursuant to the terms of subsection (d) of this section, shall order as follows:

Impose, for the first violation, a fine in the amount of two hundred dollars ($200) to five hundred dollars ($500) and shall order the person to perform ten (10) to sixty (60) hours of public community restitution. The person’s driving license in this state shall be suspended for a period of six (6) months to one year. The traffic tribunal judge or magistrate shall require attendance at a special course on driving while intoxicated or under the influence of a controlled substance and/or alcohol or drug treatment for the individual. The traffic tribunal judge or magistrate may prohibit that person from operating a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system and/or blood and urine testing as provided in §

31-27-2.8

.

Every person convicted of a second violation within a five-year (5) period, except with respect to cases of refusal to submit to a blood test, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor; shall be imprisoned for not more than six (6) months; shall pay a fine in the amount of six hundred dollars ($600) to one thousand dollars ($1,000); perform sixty (60) to one hundred (100) hours of public community restitution; and the person’s driving license in this state shall be suspended for a period of one year to two (2) years. The judge or magistrate shall require alcohol and/or drug treatment for the individual. The sentencing judge or magistrate shall prohibit that person from operating a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system and/or blood and urine testing as provided in §

31-27-2.8

.

Every person convicted for a third or subsequent violation within a five-year (5) period, except with respect to cases of refusal to submit to a blood test, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor; and shall be imprisoned for not more than one year; fined eight hundred dollars ($800) to one thousand dollars ($1,000); shall perform not less than one hundred (100) hours of public community restitution; and the person’s operator’s license in this state shall be suspended for a period of two (2) years to five (5) years. The sentencing judge or magistrate shall prohibit that person from operating a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system and/or blood and urine testing as provided in §

31-27-2

.8. The judge or magistrate shall require alcohol or drug treatment for the individual. Provided, that prior to the reinstatement of a license to a person charged with a third or subsequent violation within a three-year (3) period, a hearing shall be held before a judge or magistrate. At the hearing, the judge or magistrate shall review the person’s driving record, his or her employment history, family background, and any other pertinent factors that would indicate that the person has demonstrated behavior that warrants the reinstatement of his or her license.

For a second violation within a five-year (5) period with respect to a case of a refusal to submit to a blood test, a fine in the amount of six hundred dollars ($600) to one thousand dollars ($1,000); the person shall perform sixty (60) to one hundred (100) hours of public community restitution; and the person’s driving license in this state shall be suspended for a period of two (2) years. The judicial officer shall require alcohol and/or drug treatment for the individual. The sentencing judicial officer shall prohibit that person from operating a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system as provided in §

31-27-2

.8. Such a violation with respect to refusal to submit to a chemical blood test shall be a civil offense.

For a third or subsequent violation within a five-year (5) period with respect to a case of a refusal to submit to a blood test, a fine in the amount of eight hundred dollars ($800) to one thousand dollars ($1,000); the person shall perform not less than one hundred (100) hours of public community restitution; and the person’s driving license in this state shall be suspended for a period of two (2) to five (5) years. The sentencing judicial officer shall prohibit that person from operating a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system as provided in § 31-27-2.8. The judicial officer shall require alcohol and/or drug treatment for the individual. Such a violation with respect to refusal to submit to a chemical test of blood shall be a civil offense. Provided, that prior to the reinstatement of a license to a person charged with a third or subsequent violation within a three-year (3) period, a hearing shall be held before a judicial officer. At the hearing, the judicial officer shall review the person’s driving record, his or her employment history, family background, and any other pertinent factors that would indicate that the person has demonstrated behavior that warrants the reinstatement of their license.

For purposes of determining the period of license suspension, a prior violation shall constitute any charge brought and sustained under the provisions of this section or § 31-27-2.

In addition to any other fines, a highway safety assessment of five hundred dollars ($500) shall be paid by any person found in violation of this section, the assessment to be deposited into the general fund. The assessment provided for by this subsection shall be collected from a violator before any other fines authorized by this section.

In addition to any other fines and highway safety assessments, a two-hundred-dollar ($200) assessment shall be paid by any person found in violation of this section to support the department of health’s chemical testing programs outlined in §§

31-27-2(f)

and

31-27-2(g)

, that shall be deposited as general revenues, not restricted receipts.

No fines, suspensions, assessments, alcohol or drug treatment programs, course on driving while intoxicated or under the influence of a controlled substance, or public community restitution provided for under this section can be suspended.

Implied consent notice for persons eighteen (18) years of age or older: “Rhode Island law requires you to submit to a chemical test of your blood, breath, or urine for the purpose of determining the chemical content of your body fluids or breath. If you refuse this testing, certain penalties can be imposed and include the following: for a first offense, your Rhode Island driver’s license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state can be suspended for six (6) months to one year or modified to permit operation in connection with an ignition interlock device for a period specified by law; a fine from two hundred dollars ($200) to five hundred dollars ($500) can be imposed; and you can be ordered to perform ten (10) to sixty (60) hours of community service and attend a special course on driving while intoxicated or under the influence of a controlled substance and/or alcohol or drug treatment. If you have had one or more previous offenses within the past five (5) years, your refusal to submit to a chemical test of breath or urine at this time can have criminal penalties, including incarceration up to six (6) months for a second offense and up to one year for a third or subsequent offense, and can carry increased license suspension or ignition interlock period, fines, and community service. All violators shall pay a five hundred dollar ($500) highway safety assessment fee, a two hundred dollar ($200) department of health chemical testing programs assessment fee, and a license reinstatement fee. Refusal to submit to a chemical test of blood shall not subject you to criminal penalties for the refusal itself, but if you have one or more previous offenses other civil penalties may increase. You have the right to be examined at your own expense by a physician selected by you. If you submit to a chemical test at this time, you have the right to have an additional chemical test performed at your own expense. You will be afforded a reasonable opportunity to exercise these rights. Access to a telephone will be made available for you to make those arrangements. You may now use a telephone.”

Use of this implied consent notice shall serve as evidence that a person’s consent to a chemical test is valid in a prosecution involving driving under the influence of liquor, controlled substances, and/or drugs.

Upon suspending or refusing to issue a license or permit as provided in subsection (a), the traffic tribunal or district court shall immediately notify the person involved in writing, and upon his or her request, within fifteen (15) days, afford the person an opportunity for a hearing as early as practical upon receipt of a request in writing. Upon a hearing, the judge may administer oaths and may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of relevant books and papers. If the judge finds after the hearing that:

The law enforcement officer making the sworn report had reasonable grounds to believe that the arrested person had been driving a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor, toluene, or any controlled substance, as defined in chapter 28 of title 21, or any combination of these;

The person, while under arrest, refused to submit to the tests upon the request of a law enforcement officer;

The person had been informed of his or her rights in accordance with §

31-27-3

; and

The person had been informed of the penalties incurred as a result of noncompliance with this section, the judge shall sustain the violation. The judge shall then impose the penalties set forth in subsection (c) of this section. Action by the judge must be taken within seven (7) days after the hearing or it shall be presumed that the judge has refused to issue his or her order of suspension.

For the purposes of this section, any test of a sample of blood, breath, or urine for the presence of alcohol that relies, in whole or in part, upon the principle of infrared light absorption is considered a chemical test.

If any provision of this section, or the application of any provision, shall, for any reason, be judged invalid, the judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder of the section, but shall be confined in this effect to the provisions or application directly involved in the controversy giving rise to the judgment.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

31-27-2.1

; P.L. 1966, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 213, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 209, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 322, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 228, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 291, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 433, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 508, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 329, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 35, § 7; P.L. 2006, ch. 232, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 10, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 230, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 326, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 127, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 141, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 435, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 24; P.L. 2021, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 171, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 12, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 12, effective May 25, 2022.

31-27-2.2.
Driving under the influence of liquor or drugs, resulting in death.

When the death of any person other than the operator ensues as a proximate result of an injury received by the operation of any vehicle, the operator of which is under the influence of any intoxicating liquor, toluene, or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of title 21, or any combination of these, the person so operating the vehicle shall be guilty of “driving under the influence of liquor or drugs, resulting in death”.

Any person charged with the commission of the offense set forth in subsection (a) of this section shall, upon conviction, be punished as follows:

Every person convicted of a first violation shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for not less than five (5) years and for not more than fifteen (15) years, in any unit of the adult correctional institutions in the discretion of the sentencing judge, by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and his or her license to operate a motor vehicle shall be revoked for a period of five (5) years. The license privilege shall not be reinstated until evidence satisfactory to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles establishes that no grounds exist which would authorize the refusal to issue a license, and until the person gives proof of financial responsibility pursuant to chapter 32 of this title.

In addition, the person convicted may be required to successfully complete alcohol or drug treatment in a program of their choice, at their own expense, as authorized by a judge of the superior court, and may successfully complete the program before any license to operate a motor vehicle is renewed.

Every person convicted of a second or subsequent violation within a five (5) year period in this state or any other state, provided the out-of-state conviction was based on the same blood-alcohol concentration as set forth in §

31-27-2

shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for not less than ten (10) years and for not more than twenty (20) years, in any unit of the adult correctional institutions in the discretion of the sentencing judge, by a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) nor more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) and his or her license to operate a motor vehicle shall be revoked for a period of five (5) years. In addition, the person convicted may be required to successfully complete alcohol or drug treatment, at their own expense, in a program established by the director of the department of corrections. The license privilege shall not be reinstated whether the convictions occurred in this or any other state until evidence satisfactory to the superior court, following a hearing establishes that no grounds exist which would authorize the refusal to issue a license, and until the person gives proof of financial responsibility pursuant to chapter 32 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 175, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 43, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 363, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 38, § 1.

31-27-2.3.
Revocation of license upon refusal to submit to preliminary breath test.

When a law enforcement officer has reason to believe that a person is driving or in actual physical control of any motor vehicle in this state while under the influence of alcohol, the law enforcement officer may require the person to submit to a preliminary breath analysis for the purpose of determining the person’s blood alcohol content. The breath analysis must be administered immediately upon the law enforcement officer’s formulation of a reasonable belief that the person is driving or in actual control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol, or immediately upon the stop of the person, whichever is later in time. Any chemical breath analysis required under this section must be administered with a device and in a manner approved by the director of the department of health for that purpose. The result of a preliminary chemical breath analysis may be used for the purpose of guiding the officer in deciding whether an arrest should be made. When a driver is arrested following a preliminary breath analysis, tests may be taken pursuant to §

31-27-2.1

. The results of a preliminary breath test may not be used as evidence in any administrative or court proceeding involving driving while intoxicated or refusing to take a breathalyzer test, except as evidence of probable cause in making the initial arrest.

If a person refuses, upon a lawful request of a law enforcement officer, to submit to a test under subsection (a) of this section, that person shall be guilty of an infraction and shall be subject to the penalty provided in §

31-41.1-4

. However, it shall be a defense to a charge of refusing a validly requested preliminary breath analysis that the medical condition of a person precluded the giving of any such test.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 326, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 123.

31-27-2.4.
Driving while in possession of controlled substances.

In addition to any other penalty prescribed by law, whoever operates any motor vehicle while knowingly having in the motor vehicle or in his or her possession, a controlled substance, as defined in §

21-28-1.02

, except for possession of up to one ounce (1 oz.) of marijuana, shall have his or her license suspended for a period of six (6) months.

This section shall not apply to any person who lawfully possesses a controlled substance, as defined in §

21-28-1.02

, as a direct result and pursuant to a valid prescription from a licensed medical practitioner, or as otherwise authorized by chapter 28 of title 21.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 334, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 221, § 3; P.L. 2012, ch. 233, § 3.

31-27-2.5.
Chemical tests to persons under eighteen (18) years of age — Refusal — License suspension.

Any person under eighteen (18) years of age who shall refuse to submit to a chemical test as provided in §

31-27-2

shall have imposed all the penalties provided by §

31-27-2

.1, but shall have his or her license suspended on a first violation for six (6) months, subject to the terms of subsection (e) of this section.

Jurisdiction for violations of this section is given to the family court.

If a person as set forth in subsection (a) of this section refuses, upon the request of a law enforcement officer, to submit to a test as provided in §

31-27-2.1

, none shall be given, but a judge of the family court, upon receipt of a report or testimony of a law enforcement officer: that he or she had probable cause to stop the arrested person and reasonable grounds to believe the arrested person had been driving a motor vehicle within this state while impaired by intoxicating liquor, toluene, or any controlled substance, as defined in chapter 28 of title 21, or any combination of these; that the person had been informed of his or her rights in accordance with §

31-27-3

; that the person had been informed of the implied consent notice contained in subsection (h) of this section; and that the person had refused to submit to the test upon the request of a law enforcement officer; shall promptly order a hearing on whether the person’s operator’s license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state shall be suspended. Upon suspension, the judge shall order the license of the person to be surrendered to the department of administration, division of motor vehicles, within three (3) days.

If the person takes a test, as provided in §

31-27-2

and the test determines the person’s blood alcohol concentration to be at least two-hundredths of one percent (.02%) but less than one-tenth of one percent (.1%) by weight, the person shall be determined to have been driving while impaired. A judge of the family court shall, pursuant to the terms of subsection (e) of this section, order as follows:

A highway safety assessment of one hundred fifty dollars ($150), or community restitution in lieu of highway safety assessment shall be paid by any person found in violation of this section. The assessment shall be deposited into the general fund.

The person’s driving license shall be suspended for six (6) months on a first violation, and may be suspended for a period of up to twelve (12) months, provided the person also shall attend a special course on driving while intoxicated and provided that the person shall also attend an alcohol and/or drug treatment program if ordered by the family court judge. Failure or refusal of the person to attend the course and/or alcohol or drug treatment program shall result in the person’s driving license being suspended until the course or treatment program has been completed.

On a second violation of this section, the person’s driving license shall be suspended until he or she is twenty-one (21) years of age. The sentencing judge shall require alcohol and/or drug treatment for the individual.

On a third or subsequent violation, the person’s driving license shall be suspended for an additional period of two (2) years and the sentencing judge shall require alcohol and/or drug treatment for the individual.

No suspensions, assessments, driving while intoxicated school, or alcohol and/or drug treatment programs under this section can be suspended, shortened, altered, or changed.

Upon suspending a license or permit as provided in subsection (a), (c), or (d) of this section, the family court shall immediately notify the person involved, in writing, as well as the custodial parent if the person is under the age of eighteen (18) years.

The police department which charges any person under eighteen (18) years of age with refusal to submit to a chemical test, driving while impaired by intoxicating liquors or drugs, or driving while under the influence of liquor or drugs, shall ascertain the name and address of the custodial parent of the person and shall notify the parent in writing within ten (10) days of the charge.

The department of administration, upon issuing a first license to a person sixteen (16) or seventeen (17) years of age, shall provide a written notice of the penalties provided by this section. Any violation of this section shall not be considered a criminal offense.

Implied consent notice for persons under eighteen (18) years of age:

“Rhode Island law requires you to submit to a chemical test of your blood, breath, or urine for the purpose of determining the chemical content of your body fluids or breath. If you refuse this testing, certain penalties can be imposed. These penalties include the following: your Rhode Island driver’s license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state can be suspended for six (6) months or modified to permit operation in connection with an ignition interlock device for a period specified by law; a fine from two hundred dollars ($200) to five hundred dollars ($500) can be imposed; and you can be ordered to perform ten (10) to sixty (60) hours of community service and attend a special course on driving while intoxicated or under the influence of a controlled substance and/or alcohol or drug treatment. If you have had one or more previous offenses within the past five (5) years, your loss or modification of license, fine, and community service sanctions can increase over those provided for a first offense. All violators shall pay a five hundred dollar ($500) highway safety assessment fee, a two hundred dollar ($200) department of health chemical testing programs fee, and a license reinstatement fee. If you refuse to submit to a chemical test, you will be required to maintain proof of financial responsibility for three (3) years. Refusal to submit to a chemical test shall not be considered a criminal offense. You have the right to be examined at your own expense by a physician selected by you. If you submit to a chemical test at this time, you have the right to have an additional chemical test performed at your own expense. You will be afforded a reasonable opportunity to exercise these rights. Access to a telephone will be made available for you to make those arrangements. You may now use the telephone.”

Use of this implied consent notice shall serve as evidence that a person’s consent to a chemical test is valid in a trial for driving under the influence of liquor, controlled substances, and/or drugs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 420, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 496, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 35, § 7; P.L. 1995, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 171, § 1.

31-27-2.6.
Driving under the influence of liquor or drugs, resulting in serious bodily injury.

When serious bodily injury of any person other than the operator is caused by the operation of any motor vehicle, the operator of which is under the influence of any intoxicating liquor, toluene, or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of title 21 or any combination of these, the person so operating the vehicle shall be guilty of driving under the influence of liquor or drugs, resulting in serious bodily injury.

As used in this section, “serious bodily injury” means physical injury that creates a substantial risk of death or causes serious physical disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily member or organ.

Any person charged with the commission of the offense set forth in subsection (a) of this section shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment for not less than one year and for not more than ten (10) years and by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000). The sentencing judge shall have the discretion to sentence the person to any unit of the adult correctional institutions. The license of the person may be revoked for a period of up to two (2) years. The license privilege shall not be reinstated until evidence satisfactory to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles establishes that no grounds exist which would authorize refusal to issue a license and until the person gives proof of financial responsibility pursuant to chapter 32 of this title. In addition, the person convicted may be required to successfully complete alcohol or drug treatment, at their own expense, in a program established by the director of the department of corrections.

For a second or subsequent conviction under this section within a five (5) year period, a person shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than two (2) years nor more than fifteen (15) years and by a fine of not less than three thousand dollars ($3,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000). The sentencing judge shall have the discretion to sentence the person to any unit of the adult correctional institutions. In addition, the person convicted may be required to successfully complete alcohol or drug treatment, at their own expense, in a program established by the director of the department of corrections. The license of the person may be revoked for a period of up to four (4) years. The license privilege shall not thereafter be reinstated until evidence satisfactory to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles establishes that no grounds exist which would authorize refusal to issue a license and until the person gives proof of financial responsibility pursuant to chapter 32 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 571, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 363, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 130, § 1.

31-27-2.7.
Driving while impaired.

A person under the age of twenty-one (21) but at least eighteen (18) years of age who takes a test, as provided for in §

31-27-2

, at the request of a law enforcement officer who believes the person to be driving under the influence of alcohol, shall be determined to have been driving while impaired if the test determines the person’s blood alcohol concentration to be at least two-hundredths of one percent (.02%) but less than eight one hundredths of one percent (.08%) by weight.

Should, after a hearing in district court, it be determined that: the results of the test are admissible in that it meets all of the conditions, as set forth in §

31-27-2

; and the person has been afforded his or her rights as set forth in §

31-27-2

; then the judge shall order as follows:

A fine of not more than two hundred and fifty dollars ($250) and thirty (30) hours of community restitution. The fine shall be deposited in the general fund.

The person’s driving license shall be suspended for not less than one nor more than three (3) months on a first violation, provided the person also shall attend a special course in driving while intoxicated and provided that the person shall also attend an alcohol and/or drug treatment program if ordered by the district court judge. Failure or refusal of the person to attend the course and/or alcohol or drug treatment program shall result in the person’s driving license being suspended until such time as the course and/or treatment program has been completed.

On a second and subsequent violation of the section, the person shall be fined not more than two hundred and fifty dollars ($250) together with a highway safety assessment of three hundred dollars ($300) and shall be required to perform up to sixty (60) hours of community restitution. The person’s driving license shall be suspended for not less than three (3) months nor more than six (6) months. The sentencing judge shall also require the person to attend a special course in driving while intoxicated and also attend an alcohol and/or drug treatment program.

No suspension, assessments, driving while intoxicated school, or alcohol and/or drug treatment programs under this section can be suspended, shortened, altered, or changed.

Any violation of the section shall not be considered a criminal offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 329, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 35, § 7; P.L. 1995, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 317, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 390, § 1.